District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.112

Exemption of government agencies from fees levied for Mayor as registered agent.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, Pub. L. 87-569, § 112
as added Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-64, § 3(c), 31 DCR 195
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.112.
1981 Ed., § 29-599.14.